Colorado, session 2026A, HB1051.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Colorado:
SECTION 1. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 40-9.8-104, amend (5)
introductory portion; and repeal (7) as follows:
40-9.8-104. Microgrids for community resilience grant program
- creation - grant application process - report.
(5) On or before December 1, 2023, and NOTWITHSTANDING
SECTION 24-1-136 (11)(a)(I), on or before December 1 of each year,
thereafter, the division shall submit a report summarizing the grants
________
Capital letters or bold & italic numbers indicate new material added to existing law; dashes
through words or numbers indicate deletions from existing law and such material is not part of
the act.

awarded in the previous twelve months through the grant program,
including:
(7) This section is repealed, effective September 1, 2026.
SECTION 2. Safety clause. The general assembly finds,
determines, and declares that this act is necessary for the immediate
preservation of the public peace, health, or safety or for appropriations for
PAGE 2-HOUSE BILL 26-1051

the support and maintenance of the departments of the state and state
institutions.
____________________________ ____________________________
Julie McCluskie James Rashad Coleman, Sr.
SPEAKER OF THE HOUSE PRESIDENT OF
OF REPRESENTATIVES THE SENATE
____________________________ ____________________________
Vanessa Reilly Esther van Mourik
CHIEF CLERK OF THE HOUSE SECRETARY OF
OF REPRESENTATIVES THE SENATE
APPROVED________________________________________
(Date and Time)
_________________________________________
Jared S. Polis
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF COLORADO
PAGE 3-HOUSE BILL 26-1051